Utah statutes.
20A-14-102.   Official maps of state board districts.
(1) (a)  The Legislature shall file copies of the official maps enacted by the
Legislature with the lieutenant governor's office.
(b)  The legal boundaries of State Board of Education districts are contained
in the official maps on file with the lieutenant governor's office.
(2)  When questions of interpretation of state board district boundaries
arise, the official maps on file in the lieutenant governor's office shall
serve as the indication of the legislative intent in drawing the state board
district boundaries.
(3) (a)  Each county clerk shall obtain copies of the official maps for the
clerk's county from the lieutenant governor's office.
(b)  Each county clerk shall establish voting precincts and polling places
within each state board district according to the procedures and requirements
of Section 20A-5-303.
(4)  Maps identifying the boundaries for state board districts may be viewed
on the Internet at the lieutenant governor's website.
